Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1798.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-728g of Title 63, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


This act may be known and cited as the “Medical Ethics Defense


Act”.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-728h of Title 63, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

Req. No. 3539 Page 1


1. “Conscience” means the ethical, moral, or religious beliefs


or principles held by any medical practitioner, health care


institution, or health care payer. Conscience with respect to


institutional entities or corporate bodies, as opposed to individual


persons, is determined by reference to that entity’s or body’s


governing documents including, but not limited to, any published


ethical, moral, or religious guidelines or directives; mission


statements; constitutions; articles of incorporation; bylaws;


policies; or regulations;


2. “Disclosure” means a formal or informal communication or


transmission, but does not include a communication or transmission


concerning policy decisions that lawfully exercise discretionary


authority unless the medical practitioner providing the disclosure


or transmission reasonably believes that the disclosure or


transmission evinces:


a. any violation of any law, rule, or regulation,


b. any violation of any ethical guidelines for the


provision of any medical procedure or service, or


c. gross mismanagement, a gross waste of funds, an abuse


of authority, practices or methods of treatment that


may put patient health at risk, or a substantial and


specific danger to public health or safety;


3. “Discrimination” means any adverse action taken against, or


any threat of adverse action communicated to, any medical

Req. No. 3539 Page 2


practitioner, health care institution, or health care payer as a


result of his, her, or its decision to decline to participate in a


medical procedure or service on the basis of conscience.


Discrimination includes, but is not limited to:


a. termination of employment,


b. transfer from current position,


c. demotion from current position,


d. adverse administrative action,


e. reassignment to a different shift or job title,


f. increased administrative duties,


g. refusal of staff privileges,


h. refusal of board certification,


i. loss of career specialty,


j. reduction of wages, benefits, or privileges,


k. refusal to award a grant, contract, or other program,


l. refusal to provide residency training opportunities,


m. denial, deprivation, or disqualification of licensure,


n. withholding or disqualifying from financial aid and


other assistance,


o. impediments to creating any health care institution or


payer or expanding or improving such health care


institution or payer,


p. impediments to acquiring, associating with, or merging


with any other health care institution or payer,

Req. No. 3539 Page 3


q. the threat thereof with regard to any of the


preceding, or


r. any other penalty, disciplinary, or retaliatory


action, whether executed or threatened.


However, discrimination excludes the negotiation or purchase of


insurance by a nongovernment entity;


4. “Medical procedure or service” means medical care provided


to any patient at any time over the entire course of treatment, or


medical research. The term includes, but is not limited to,


testing; diagnosis; referral; dispensing or administering any drug,


medication, or device; psychological therapy or counseling;


research; prognosis; therapy; record-making procedures; notes


related to treatment; set up or performance of a surgery or


procedure; or any other care or service performed or provided by any


medical practitioner including, but not limited to, physicians,


nurses, allied health professionals, paraprofessionals, contractors,


or employees of health care institutions;


5. “Health care institution” means any organization,


corporation, partnership, association, agency, network, sole


proprietorship, joint venture, or other entity that provides medical


procedures or services. The term includes, but is not limited to,


any public or private hospital, clinic, medical center, physician


organization, professional association, ambulatory surgical center,


private physician’s office, pharmacy, nursing home, medical school,

Req. No. 3539 Page 4


nursing school, medical training facility, or any other entity or


location in which medical procedures or services are performed;


6. “Health care payer” means any employer, health plan, health


maintenance organization, insurance company, management services


organization, or any other entity that pays for, or arranges for the


payment of, any medical procedure or service provided to any


patient, whether that payment is made in whole or in part;


7. “Medical practitioner” means any person or individual who


may be or is asked to participate in any way in any medical


procedure or service. The term includes, but is not limited to,


doctors, nurse practitioners, physician assistants, nurses, nurse


aides, allied health professionals, medical assistants, hospital


employees, clinic employees, nursing home employees, pharmacists,


pharmacy technicians and employees, medical school faculty and


students, nursing school faculty and students, psychology and


counseling faculty and students, medical researchers, laboratory


technicians, psychologists, psychiatrists, counselors, mental health


professionals, social workers, or any other person who facilitates


or participates in the provision of a medical procedure or service;


8. “Participate” means to provide, perform, assist with,


facilitate, refer for, counsel for, advise with regard to, admit for


the purposes of providing, or take part in any way in providing any


medical procedure or service, or any form of such service; and



Req. No. 3539 Page 5


9. “Pay” or “payment” means to pay for, contract for, arrange


for the payment of, whether in whole or in part, reimburse, or


remunerate.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-728i of Title 63, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Freedom of Conscience. A medical practitioner, health care


institution, or health care payer has the right not to participate


in or pay for any medical procedure or service which violates his,


her, or its conscience.


B. Limitations. The exercise of the right of conscience is


limited to conscience-based objections to a particular medical


procedure or service. This section shall not be construed to waive


or modify any duty a health care practitioner, health care


institution, or health care payer may have to provide other medical


procedures or services that do not violate the practitioner’s,


institution’s, or payer’s conscience.


C. Immunity from Liability. No medical practitioner, health


care institution, or health care payer shall be civilly, criminally,


or administratively liable for exercising his, her, or its right of


conscience not to participate in or pay for a medical procedure or


service. No health care institution shall be civilly, criminally,


or administratively liable for the exercise of conscience rights not


to participate in a medical procedure or service by a medical

Req. No. 3539 Page 6


practitioner employed, contracted, or granted admitting privileges


by the health care institution.


D. Discrimination. No medical practitioner, health care


institution, or health care payer shall be discriminated against in


any manner as a result of his, her, or its decision to decline to


participate in or pay for a medical procedure or service on the


basis of conscience.


E. Exception. Notwithstanding any other provision of this act


to the contrary, a religious medical practitioner, health care


institution, or health care payer that holds itself out to the


public as religious, states in its governing documents that it has a


religious purpose or mission, and has internal operating policies or


procedures that implement its religious beliefs shall have the right


to make employment, staffing, contracting, and admitting privilege


decisions consistent with its religious beliefs.


F. Opt-In Required. A health care practitioner may not be


scheduled for, assigned, or requested to directly or indirectly


perform, facilitate, refer for, or participate in an abortion unless


the practitioner first affirmatively consents in writing to perform,


facilitate, refer for, or participate in the abortion. This


subsection does not establish a right to participate in an abortion


otherwise prohibited by law.


G. Emergency Medical Treatments. Nothing in this act shall be


construed to override the requirement to provide emergency medical

Req. No. 3539 Page 7


treatment to all patients set forth in 42 U.S.C., Section 1395dd.


Medical emergencies shall be subject to the definitions and


requirements of Section 1-731.4 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma


Statutes.


SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-728j of Title 63, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. No medical practitioner shall be discriminated against in


any manner because the medical practitioner:


1. Provided, caused to be provided, or is about to provide or


cause to be provided to his or her employer, the Attorney General,


any state agency charged with protecting health care rights of


conscience, the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services, the


Office for Civil Rights, or any other federal agency charged with


protecting health care rights of conscience information relating to


any violation of, or any act or omission the medical practitioner


reasonably believes to be a violation of, any provision of this act;


2. Testified or is about to testify in a proceeding concerning


such violation; or


3. Assisted or participated, or is about to assist or


participate, in such a proceeding.


B. Unless the disclosure is specifically prohibited by law, no


medical practitioner shall be discriminated against in any manner



Req. No. 3539 Page 8


because the medical practitioner disclosed any information that the


medical practitioner reasonably believes evinces:


1. Any violation of any law, rule, or regulation;


2. Any violation of any ethical guidelines for the provision of


any medical procedure or service; or


3. Gross mismanagement, a gross waste of funds, an abuse of


authority, practices or methods of treatment that may put patient


health at risk, or a substantial and specific danger to public


health or safety.


C. A licensing board may not reprimand, sanction, or revoke or


threaten to revoke a license, certificate, or registration of a


health care practitioner for engaging in speech or expressive


activity protected under the First Amendment to the United States


Constitution, unless the licensing board demonstrates beyond a


reasonable doubt that the practitioner’s speech was the direct cause


of physical harm to a person with whom the health care practitioner


had a practitioner-patient relationship within the three (3) years


immediately preceding the incident of physical harm.


1. The licensing board shall provide a medical practitioner


with any complaints it has received which may result in the


revocation of the medical practitioner’s license, certification, or


registration, within seven (7) days after receipt of the complaint.


2. The licensing board shall pay the medical practitioner an


administrative penalty of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) for each

Req. No. 3539 Page 9


day the complaint is not provided to the medical practitioner after


the specified seven (7) days.


SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-728k of Title 63, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Civil Action for Violation of Right of Conscience. A civil


action for damages or injunctive relief, or both, may be brought by


any medical practitioner, health care institution, or health care


payer for any violation of any provision of this act. Any


additional burden or expense on another medical practitioner, health


care institution, or health care payer arising from the exercise of


the right of conscience shall not be a defense to any violation of


this act. However, no civil action may be brought against an


individual who declines to use or purchase medical procedures or


services from a specific medical practitioner, health care


institution, or health care payer for exercising the rights granted


in subsection A of Section 3 of this act.


B. Other Remedies. Any party aggrieved by any violation of


this act may commence a civil action and shall be entitled, upon the


finding of a violation, to recover treble damages sustained, along


with the costs of the action and reasonable attorney fees. Such


damages shall be cumulative and in no way limited by any other


remedies which may be available under any other federal, state, or


municipal law. A court considering such civil action may also award

Req. No. 3539 Page 10


injunctive relief, which may include, but is not limited to,


reinstatement of a medical practitioner to his or her previous


position, reinstatement of board certification, and relicensure of a


health care institution or health care payer.


SECTION 6. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3539 BRC 1/14/2026 8:48:24 PM



































Req. No. 3539 Page 11